District of Columbia statutes.
26-404

Uniformity of laws.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of the District of Columbia with the law of those states which enact the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act.

History

Oct. 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 939, ch. 767, § 4

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-304.
1973 Ed., § 26-704.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 3 of the Uniform Common Trust Fund Act.